Wyoming, session 2026, SF0040.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-11-112(a) by creating a new
paragraph (vii) and 36-2-101 are amended to read:

SF0040

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0085
35-11-112. Powers and duties of the environmental
quality council.

(a) The council shall act as the hearing examiner for
the department and shall hear and determine all cases or
issues arising under the laws, rules, regulations,
standards or orders issued or administered by the
department or its air quality, land quality, solid and
hazardous waste management or water quality divisions. At
the council's request the office of administrative hearings
may provide a hearing officer for any rulemaking or
contested case hearing before the council, and the hearing
officer may provide recommendations on procedural matters
when requested by the council. Notwithstanding any other
provision of this act, including this section, the council
shall have no authority to promulgate rules or to hear or
determine any case or issue arising under the laws, rules,
regulations, standards or orders issued or administered by
the industrial siting or abandoned mine land divisions of
the department. The council shall:

(vii) Review and approve applications for
designations of state lands as defined by W.S.
SF0040

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0085
36-1-101(a)(iv) as having significant community value, in
accordance with all of the following:

(A) A board of county commissioners may
apply to the council for a designation of any state land
parcel located within the county as state land with
significant community value;

(B) For purposes of this subsection, state
land parcels shall be deemed to have significant community
value if the board of county commissioners applying for the
designation demonstrates that the parcel has particular
historical, archaeological, wildlife, surface geological or
botanical features that may be inconsistent with a proposed
use for the state land parcel;

(C) The council shall hold a hearing and
accept public comment on any application received under
this paragraph;

(D) If, after the hearing, the council
finds that the proposed state land parcel has significant
community value to where the board of land commissioners
SF0040

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0085
should consider that community value when evaluating the
parcel for any change in use of the parcel as specified in
W.S. 36-2-101(b), the council may approve the application;

(E) If the application is approved, the
council shall send a copy of its findings and the order to
the board of land commissioners and the director of the
office of state lands and investments not later than five
(5) days after entry of the order.

36-2-101. Composition; powers generally.

(a) The governor, secretary of state, state
treasurer, state auditor, and superintendent of public
instruction, being constituted a "board of land
commissioners" by the provisions of section 3, article 18,
of the constitution of the state of Wyoming, shall as such
board, have the direction, control, leasing, care and
disposal of all lands heretofore or hereafter granted or
acquired by the state for the benefit and support of public
schools or for any other purpose whatsoever, subject to the
limitations contained in the constitution of the state, and
the laws enacted by the legislature. The board shall have
SF0040

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0085
the power and authority to take such official action as may
be necessary in securing title to land grants, or any other
lands acquired by the state. The board shall oversee the
compensatory mitigation credit system established under
W.S. 9-19-201 through 9-19-204 and shall promulgate rules
and regulations in accordance with W.S. 9-19-201 through
9-19-204.

(b) For any state land parcel that the environmental
quality council has designated as a parcel with significant
community value under W.S. 35-11-112(a)(vii), the board
shall not consider any proposed change in use for that
designated parcel under a consent agenda. The board shall
consider any proposal for that parcel individually and
shall give consideration to the designation and the
environmental quality council's findings on the state land
parcel before approving any change in use for the parcel.
As used in this subsection, "change in use" includes any
change of use for the parcel, new lease, lease renewal or
disposition of the parcel.

Section 2.

SF0040

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0085
(a) The board of land commissioners shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.

(b) The environmental quality council, upon
recommendation from the department of environmental
quality, shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement
this act.

Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0040